activities/make/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
walk V ;
talk V ;
pack V ;
t V-each-aught ; ! teach+V+Past:taught

LEXICON V-each-aught
each+V+Pres+3Sg:eaches # ;
each+V+Pres:each # ;
each+V+Past:aught # ;

LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

LEXICON V-suff
+Pres+3Sg:s   # ;
+Past:ed  # ;
+PresPtc:ing # ;
+Pres:    # ;
